Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 729. OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLE BY MINOR

Sec. 729.001. OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLE BY MINOR IN VIOLATION OF TRAFFIC LAWS; OFFENSE. (a) A person who is younger than 17 years of age commits an offense if the person operates a motor vehicle on a public road or highway, a street or alley in a municipality, or a public beach in violation of any traffic law of this state, including:

(1) Chapter 502, other than Section 502.282 or 502.412;

(2) Chapter 521, other than an offense under Section 521.457;

(3) Subtitle C, other than an offense punishable by imprisonment or by confinement in jail under Section 550.021, 550.022, 550.024, or 550.025;

(4) Chapter 601;

(5) Chapter 621;

(6) Chapter 661; and

(7) Chapter 681.

(b) In this section, "beach" means a beach bordering on the Gulf of Mexico that extends inland from the line of mean low tide to the natural line of vegetation bordering on the seaward shore of the Gulf of Mexico, or the larger contiguous area to which the public has acquired a right of use or easement to or over by prescription, dedication, or estoppel, or has retained a right by virtue of continuous right in the public since time immemorial as recognized by law or custom.

(c) An offense under this section is punishable by the fine or other sanction, other than confinement or imprisonment, authorized by statute for violation of the traffic law listed under Subsection (a) that is the basis of the prosecution under this section.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.167, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 30.167, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 822, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 283, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 729.002. OPERATION OF MOTOR VEHICLE BY MINOR WITHOUT LICENSE. (a) A person who is younger than 17 years of age commits an offense if the person operates a motor vehicle without a driver's license authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle on a:

(1) public road or highway;

(2) street or alley in a municipality; or

(3) public beach as defined by Section 729.001.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable in the same manner as if the person was 17 years of age or older and operated a motor vehicle without a license as described by Subsection (a), except that an offense under this section is not punishable by confinement or imprisonment.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 43, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1477, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.